Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,175
Agency, defined.

As used in the Tax Refund Setoff Act, unless the context otherwise requires, agency shall mean the Department of Revenue, any other body in the executive branch of state government, any political subdivision of this state, or the federal Internal Revenue Service.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 29.